Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.030

Modernization of existing school facilities.

Whenever funds are appropriated for modernization of existing school facilities, the superintendent of public instruction is authorized to approve the use of such funds for modernization of existing facilities, modernization being limited to major structural changes in such facilities and, as necessary to bring such facilities into compliance with the barrier free access requirements of section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and rules implementing the act, both major and minor structural changes, and may include as incidental thereto the replacement of fixtures, fittings, furnishings and service systems of a building in order to bring it up to a contemporary state consistent with the needs of changing educational programs. The allocation of such funds shall be made upon the same basis as funds used for the financing of a new school plant project utilized for a similar purpose.

[ 2006 c 263 s 302; 1995 c 77 s 23; 1980 c 154 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.073. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 21 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.47.073, 28.47.073.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Purpose—Effective dates—Savings—Disposition of certain funds—Severability—1980 c 154: See notes following chapter 82.45 RCW digest.